Maryland, session 2026, HB0221.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
Article I – Elective Franchise
2B.
DURING A PRIMARY ELECTION, A VOTER MAY APPEAR IN PERSON AT AN EARLY
VOTING CENTER OR A PRECINCT POLLING PLACE AND CHANGE THE VOTER’S
POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION AND VOTE THE BALLOT FOR THE VOTER’S NEW
POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0221*

HOUSE BILL 221
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Election Law
3–303.
(a) Notification of a change of party affiliation or a change to or from a decline
may be made:
(1) by information provided on a voter registration application by the same
methods provided for registration under Subtitle 2 of this title;
(2) by written notice, signed by the voter and sent by mail or otherwise
delivered to the local board in the county where the voter’s current voter registration
address is located or to which the voter has moved;
(3) by making application in person at the office of the local board in the
county where the voter’s current voter registration address is located or to which the voter
has moved;
(4) by information on a voter authority card or other appropriate form filled
out in a polling place; or
(5) by changing a name or address with the Motor Vehicle Administration.
(b) Party affiliation changes or changes to or from a decline:
(1) shall be processed at any time that registration is open; and
(2) except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, may not be processed
when registration is closed.
(c) (1) If a local board receives a request for a party affiliation change after the
close of registration, the local board shall make the change and it shall become effective for
the next election provided:
[(1)] (I) there is sufficient evidence, as determined by the local boards
pursuant to regulations adopted by the State Board, that the request was mailed on or
before the close of registration for that election; or
[(2)] (II) the request was submitted by the voter to the Motor Vehicle
Administration, a voter registration agency, another local board, or the State Board on or
before the close of registration for that election.

HOUSE BILL 221 3
(2) DURING A PRIMARY ELECTION, A VOTER MAY APPEAR IN PERSON
AT AN EARLY VOTING CENTER OR A PRECINCT POLLING PLACE AND CHANGE THE
VOTER’S POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION AND VOTE THE BALLOT FOR THE VOTER’S
NEW POLITICAL PARTY AFFILIATION.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the amendment to the
Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this Act shall be submitted to the qualified
voters of the State at the next general election to be held in November 2026 for adoption or
rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution. At that general
election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the Constitution shall be by ballot, and on
each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the Constitutional Amendment” and
“Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now provided by law. Immediately after the
election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of the vote for and against the proposed
amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the Maryland Constitution, and further
proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act is
contingent on the passage of Section 1 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by the voters of the State.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 5 of this
Act, Section 2 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the Governor that the
constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast at the general
election, has been adopted by the people of Maryland.